pt-BR: Área alvo do tratamento: Sobrancelhas; Cílios; Cílios e sobrancelhas; Outro
fr: Zone cible du traitement: Sourcils; Cils; Cils et sourcils; Autre
el: Περιοχή στόχος θεραπείας: Φρύδια; Βλεφαρίδες; Βλεφαρίδες και φρύδια; Άλλο
vi: Vùng mục tiêu điều trị: Lông mày; Lông mi; Lông mi và lông mày; Khác
zh-CN: 护理目标区域: 眉毛; 睫毛; 睫毛和眉毛; 其他
th: พื้นที่เป้าหมายการรักษา: คิ้ว; ขนตา; ขนตาและคิ้ว; อื่นๆ
ko: 트리트먼트 대상 부위: 브로우; 래쉬; 래쉬 및 브로우; 기타
sk-SK: Cieľová oblasť ošetrenia: Obočie; Riasy; Riasy a obočie; Iné
en: Treatment target area: Brows; Lashes; Lashes and brows; Other
tr: Tedavi hedef alanı: Kaşlar; Kirpikler; Kirpikler ve kaşlar; Diğer
es: Área objetivo del tratamiento: Cejas; Pestañas; Pestañas y cejas; Otros
zh-TW: 護理目標區域: 眉毛; 睫毛; 睫毛和眉毛; 其他
nb: Behandlingsmålområde: Bryn; Vipper; Vipper og bryn; Annet
pt-PT: Área alvo do tratamento: Sobrancelhas; Pestanas; Pestanas e sobrancelhas; Outro
ru: Целевая область обработки: Брови; Ресницы; Ресницы и брови; Другой
nl: Behandeling doelgebied: Wenkbrauwen; Wimpers; Wimpers en wenkbrauwen; Andere
hu: Kezelés célterülete: Szemöldök; Szempillák; Szempillák és szemöldök; Egyéb
pl: Obszar docelowy zabiegu: Brwi; Rzęsy; Rzęsy i brwi; Inne
cs: Cílová oblast ošetření: Obočí; Řasy; Řasy a obočí; Jiné
de: Behandlungszielbereich: Augenbrauen; Wimpern; Wimpern und Augenbrauen; Sonstiges
fi: Hoidon kohdealue: Kulmakarvat; Ripset; Ripset ja kulmakarvat; Muu
it: Area di trattamento target: Sopracciglia; Ciglia; Ciglia e sopracciglia; Altro
lt-LT: Procedūros tikslinė sritis: Antakiai; Blakstienos; Blakstienos ir antakiai; Kita
bg-BG: Целева зона на третирането: Вежди; Мигли; Мигли и вежди; Други
da: Behandlingmålområde: Bryn; Vipper; Vipper og bryn; Andet
ja: トリートメント対象領域: 眉毛; まつ毛; まつ毛と眉毛; その他
ro-RO: Zona țintă de tratament: Sprâncene; Gene; Gene și sprâncene; Altele
sl-SI: Ciljno območje tretiranja: Obrvi; Trepalnice; Trepalnice in obrvi; Drugo
hr-HR: Ciljano područje tretmana: Obrve; Trepavice; Trepavice i obrve; Ostalo
sv: Behandlingsmålområde: Bryn; Fransar; Fransar och bryn; Övrigt